Illinois, session 104th, HB2568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Equality for Every Family Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 is amended 7by changing Sections 102, 103, 105, 107, 201, 204, 205, 301, 8302, 303, 305, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 407, 408, 501, 502, 9601, 602, 603, 604, 605, 606, 608, 609, 610, 612, 614, 615, 10617, 621, 622, 702, 703, 704, 705, 707, 708, 709, 710, and 903 11and by adding Section 704.5 as follows: 12    (750 ILCS 46/102)13    Sec. 102. Public policy. Illinois recognizes the right of 14every child to the physical, mental, emotional, and financial 15support of a parent or his or her parents. The parent-child 16relationship, including support obligations, extends equally 17to every child and to the child's his or her parent or to each 18of the child's his or her 2 parents, regardless of the legal 19relationship of the parents, and regardless of whether a 20parent is a minor. A child shall have the same rights and 21protections under law to parentage without regard to the 22marital status, age, gender, gender identity or sexual   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1orientation of their parents or the circumstances of the 2child's birth, including whether the child was born as a 3result of assisted reproduction or surrogacy. 4(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 5    (750 ILCS 46/103)6    Sec. 103. Definitions. In this Act:7    (a) "Acknowledged parent father" means a person man who 8has established a parent-child father-child relationship under 9Article 3. 10    (b) "Adjudicated parent father" means a person man who has 11been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, or as 12authorized under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid Code, to 13be the parent father of a child. 14    (c) "Alleged genetic parent father" means a person man who 15alleges himself to be, or is alleged to be, a genetic parent 16the biological father or a possible biological father of a 17child, but whose parentage paternity has not been adjudicated 18established. The term does not include: 19        (1) a presumed parent or acknowledged parent father; 20    or21        (2) a person man whose parental rights have been 22    terminated or declared not to exist; or23        (3) a donor. 24    (d) "Assisted reproduction" means a method of achieving a 25pregnancy through means other than by sexual intercourse,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) 2artificial insemination or intrauterine, intracervical, or 3vaginal insemination; (2) donation of gametes; (3) donation of 4embryos; (4) in vitro fertilization and embryo transfer; (5) 5intracytoplasmic sperm injection; or (6) assisted reproductive 6technology an artificial insemination or an embryo transfer 7and includes gamete and embryo donation. "Assisted 8reproduction" does not include any pregnancy achieved through 9sexual intercourse.10    (e) "Child" means an individual of any age whose parentage 11may be established under this Act. 12    (f) "Combined parentage paternity index" means the 13likelihood of parentage paternity calculated by computing the 14ratio between: 15        (1) the likelihood that the tested person man is the 16    parent father, based on the genetic markers of the tested 17    person, woman or person who gave birth man, mother, and 18    child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested 19    person man is the parent father of the child; and 20        (2) the likelihood that the tested person man is not 21    the parent father, based on the genetic markers of the 22    tested person, woman or person who gave birth man, mother, 23    and child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested 24    person man is not the parent father of the child and that 25    the parent of the child father is of the same ethnic or 26    racial group as the tested person man.   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (g) "Commence" means to file the initial pleading seeking 2an adjudication of parentage in the circuit court of this 3State. 4    (h) "Determination of parentage" means the establishment 5of the parent-child relationship by the signing of a voluntary 6acknowledgment under Article 3 of this Act or adjudication by 7the court or as authorized under Article X of the Illinois 8Public Aid Code. 9    (i) "Donor" means a person who provides gametes intended 10for use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for 11compensation. "Donor" does not include a person who is a 12parent under Article 7 or an intended parent under the 13Gestational Surrogacy Act an individual who participates in an 14assisted reproductive technology arrangement by providing 15gametes and relinquishes all rights and responsibilities to 16the gametes so that another individual or individuals may 17become the legal parent or parents of any resulting child. 18"Donor" does not include a spouse in any assisted reproductive 19technology arrangement in which his or her spouse will parent 20any resulting child.21    (j) "Ethnic or racial group" means, for purposes of 22genetic testing, a recognized group that an individual 23identifies as all or part of the individual's ancestry or that 24is so identified by other information. 25    (k) "Gamete" means either a sperm or an egg. 26    (l) "Genetic testing" means an analysis of genetic markers   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1to exclude or identify a person man as the parent father or a 2woman as the mother of a child as provided in Article 4 of this 3Act. 4    (l-5) "Gestational surrogacy" means the process by which a 5woman or person attempts to carry and give birth to a child 6created through in vitro fertilization in which the 7gestational surrogate has made no genetic contribution to any 8resulting child. 9    (m) "Gestational surrogate" means a woman or person who is 10not an intended parent and agrees to engage in a gestational 11surrogacy arrangement pursuant to the terms of a valid 12gestational surrogacy arrangement under the Gestational 13Surrogacy Act. 14    (m-5) "Intended parent" means a person person who consents 15to enters into an assisted reproduction reproductive 16technology arrangement, including a gestational surrogacy 17agreement, such that the person is a arrangement, under which 18he or she will be the legal parent parent of the resulting 19child. "Intended parent" includes, in the case of a married 20couple, both spouses for all purposes under this Act. 21    (n) "Parent" means an individual who has established a 22parent-child relationship under Section 201 of this Act. 23    (o) "Parent-child relationship" means the legal 24relationship between a child and a parent of the child.25    (p) "Presumed parent" means an individual who, by 26operation of law under Section 204 of this Act, is recognized   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1as the parent of a child unless until that status is rebutted 2or confirmed in a judicial or administrative proceeding. 3    (q) "Probability of parentage paternity" means the 4measure, for the ethnic or racial group to which the alleged 5genetic parent father belongs, of the probability that the 6person man in question is the parent father of the child, 7compared with a random, unrelated person and man of the same 8ethnic or racial group, expressed as a percentage 9incorporating the combined parentage paternity index and a 10prior probability. 11    (r) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 12tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other 13medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. 14    (s) "Signatory" means an individual who authenticates a 15record and is bound by its terms. 16    (t) "State" means a state of the United States, the 17District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin 18Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the 19jurisdiction of the United States. 20    (u) "Substantially similar legal relationship" means a 21relationship recognized in this State under Section 60 of the 22Illinois Religious Freedom Protection and Civil Union Act.23    (v) "Support-enforcement agency" means a public official 24or agency authorized to seek: 25        (1) enforcement of support orders or laws relating to 26    the duty of support;   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        (2) establishment or modification of child support; 2        (3) determination of parentage; or 3        (4) location of child-support obligors and their 4    income and assets. 5(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-763, eff. 1-1-17; 99-769, 6eff. 1-1-17; 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 7    (750 ILCS 46/105)8    Sec. 105. Authority to establish parentage. The circuit 9courts are authorized to establish parentage under this Act. 10The Department of Healthcare and Family Services may make an 11administrative determination of parentage or non-parentage 12determinations of paternity and nonpaternity in accordance 13with Section 10-17.7 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. Such 14administrative determinations shall have the full force and 15effect of court judgments entered under this Act.16(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 17    (750 ILCS 46/107)18    Sec. 107. Applicability. Insofar as practicable, the 19provisions of this Act applicable to the parent father and 20child relationship shall apply equally without regard to 21gender to the mother and child relationship including, but not 22limited to, the obligation to support.23(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/201)2    Sec. 201. Establishment of parent-child relationship. 3    (a) The parent-child relationship is established between a 4person woman and a child by: 5        (1) the woman or person having given birth to the 6    child, except as otherwise provided in the Gestational 7    Surrogacy Act;8        (2) a presumption of the person's parentage of the 9    child under Section 204 of this Act unless the presumption 10    is overcome in a judicial proceeding or a valid denial of 11    parentage is made under Section 303 of this Act an 12    adjudication of the woman's parentage;13        (3) an effective voluntary acknowledgment of parentage 14    by the person under Article 3 of this Act, unless the 15    acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully 16    challenged adoption of the child by the woman;17        (4) an adjudication of the person's parentage; a valid 18    gestational surrogacy arrangement that complies with the 19    Gestational Surrogacy Act or other law; or20        (5) the person's adoption of the child; an unrebutted 21    presumption of the woman's parentage of the child under 22    Section 204 of this Act23        (6) the person's consent to assisted reproduction 24    under Article 7 of this Act; or25        (7) the person's parentage of the child is established 26    under the provisions of the Gestational Surrogacy Act.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (b) (Blank). The parent-child relationship is established 2between a man and a child by: 3        (1) an unrebutted presumption of the man's parentage 4    of the child under Section 204 of this Act; 5        (2) an effective voluntary acknowledgment of paternity 6    by the man under Article 3 of this Act, unless the 7    acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully 8    challenged; 9        (3) an adjudication of the man's parentage; 10        (4) adoption of the child by the man; or11        (5) a valid gestational surrogacy arrangement that 12    complies with the Gestational Surrogacy Act or other law.13    (c) (Blank). Insofar as practicable, the provisions of 14this Act applicable to parent-child relationships shall apply 15equally to men and women as parents, including, but not 16limited to, the obligation to support.17(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 18    (750 ILCS 46/204)19    Sec. 204. Presumption of parentage. 20    (a) A person is presumed to be the parent of a child if: 21        (1) the person and the woman or person who gave birth 22    to mother of the child have entered into a marriage, civil 23    union, or substantially similar legal relationship, and 24    the child is born, to the woman or person who gave birth to 25    the child, mother during the marriage, civil union, or   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    substantially similar legal relationship, except as 2    provided in the Gestational Surrogacy Act or other law;3        (2) the person and the woman or person who gave birth 4    to mother of the child were in a marriage, civil union, or 5    substantially similar legal relationship and the child is 6    born, to the woman or person who gave birth to the child, 7    mother within 300 days after the marriage, civil union, or 8    substantially similar legal relationship is terminated by 9    death, declaration of invalidity of marriage, judgment for 10    dissolution of marriage, civil union, or substantially 11    similar legal relationship, or after a judgment for legal 12    separation, except as provided in the Gestational 13    Surrogacy Act or other law; 14        (3) before the birth of the child, the person and the 15    woman or person who gave birth to mother of the child 16    entered into a marriage, civil union, or substantially 17    similar legal relationship in apparent compliance with 18    law, even if the attempted marriage, civil union, or 19    substantially similar legal relationship is or could be 20    declared invalid, and the child is born during the invalid 21    marriage, civil union, or substantially similar legal 22    relationship or within 300 days after its termination by 23    death, declaration of invalidity of marriage, judgment for 24    dissolution of marriage, civil union, or substantially 25    similar legal relationship, or after a judgment for legal 26    separation, except as provided in the Gestational   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    Surrogacy Act or other law; or2        (4) after the child's birth, the person and the woman 3    or person who gave birth to the child child's mother have 4    entered into a marriage, civil union, or substantially 5    similar legal relationship, even if the marriage, civil 6    union, or substantially similar legal relationship is or 7    could be declared invalid, and the person is named, with 8    the person's written consent, as the child's parent on the 9    child's birth certificate.10    (b) If 2 or more conflicting presumptions arise under this 11Section, the presumption which on the facts is founded on the 12weightier considerations of policy and logic, especially the 13policy of promoting the child's best interests, controls. In 14weighing the presumptions, the court shall consider the 15factors enumerated in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of 16Section 610. 17(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 18    (750 ILCS 46/205)19    Sec. 205. Proceedings to declare the non-existence of the 20parent-child relationship. 21    (a) An action to declare the non-existence of the 22parent-child relationship may be brought by the child, the 23woman or person who gave birth to the child mother, or a person 24presumed to be a parent under Section 204 of this Act. Actions 25brought by the child, the woman or person who gave birth to the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1child mother, or a presumed parent shall be brought by 2verified complaint, which shall be designated a petition. 3After a presumption under Section 204 of this Act has been 4rebutted, parentage of the child by another person man or 5woman may be established in the same action, if such person he 6or she has been made a party.7    (b) An action to declare the non-existence of the 8parent-child relationship brought under subsection (a) of this 9Section shall be barred if brought later than 2 years after the 10petitioner knew or should have known of the relevant facts. 11The 2-year period for bringing an action to declare the 12non-existence of the parent-child relationship shall not 13extend beyond the date on which the child reaches the age of 18 14years. Failure to bring an action within 2 years shall not bar 15any party from asserting a defense in any action to declare the 16existence of the parent-child relationship.17    (c) An action to declare the non-existence of the 18parent-child relationship may be brought subsequent to an 19adjudication of parentage in any judgment by the person man 20adjudicated to be the parent pursuant to a presumption in 21paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(4) of Section 204 if, as a 22result of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing, it is 23discovered that the person man adjudicated to be the parent is 24not the parent father of the child. Actions brought by the 25adjudicated parent father shall be brought by verified 26petition. If, as a result of the deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1testing that is admissible under Section 614 of this Act, the 2petitioner is determined not to be the parent father of the 3child, the adjudication of parentage paternity and any orders 4regarding the allocation of parental responsibilities, 5parenting time, and future payments of support may be vacated. 6This provision shall not apply to actions involving parentage 7of children born through assisted reproduction. 8    (d) An action to declare the non-existence of the 9parent-child relationship brought under subsection (c) of this 10Section shall be barred if brought more than 2 years after the 11petitioner obtains actual knowledge of relevant facts. The 122-year period shall not apply to periods of time where the 13woman or person who gave birth to the child mother or the child 14refuses to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing. The 152-year period for bringing an action to declare the 16non-existence of the parent-child relationship shall not 17extend beyond the date on which the child reaches the age of 18 18years. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 20    (750 ILCS 46/301)21    Sec. 301. Voluntary acknowledgment. A parent-child 22relationship may be established voluntarily by the signing and 23witnessing of a voluntary acknowledgment in accordance with 24Section 12 of the Vital Records Act and Section 10-17.7 of the 25Illinois Public Aid Code. A woman or person who gave birth to a   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1child and an alleged genetic parent of the child, a presumed 2parent under Section 204, or an intended parent under Article 37, may sign an acknowledgment of parentage to establish the 4parentage of the child. The voluntary acknowledgment shall 5contain the social security numbers or tax identification 6numbers of the persons signing the voluntary acknowledgment; 7however, failure to include the social security numbers of the 8persons signing a voluntary acknowledgment does not invalidate 9the voluntary acknowledgment.10(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 11    (750 ILCS 46/302)12    Sec. 302. Execution of voluntary acknowledgment. 13    (a) A voluntary acknowledgment described in Section 301 of 14this Act must: 15        (1) be in a record; 16        (2) be signed, or otherwise authenticated, under 17    penalty of perjury by the woman or person who gave birth to 18    the child mother and by the person man seeking to 19    establish his parentage; 20        (3) state that the child whose parentage is being 21    acknowledged: 22            (A) does not have a presumed parent, or has a 23        presumed parent whose full name is stated; and 24            (B) does not have another acknowledged or 25        adjudicated parent;   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        (4) be witnessed; and 2        (5) state that the signatories understand that the 3    voluntary acknowledgment is the equivalent of a judicial 4    adjudication of parentage of the child and that: (i) a 5    challenge by a signatory to the voluntary acknowledgment 6    may be permitted only upon a showing of fraud, duress, or 7    material mistake of fact; and (ii) a challenge to the 8    voluntary acknowledgment is barred after 2 years unless 9    that period is tolled pursuant to the law. 10    (b) An acknowledgment is void if it: 11        (1) states that another person is a presumed parent, 12    unless a denial signed or otherwise authenticated by the 13    presumed parent is filed with the Department of Healthcare 14    and Family Services, as provided by law; 15        (2) states that another person is an acknowledged or 16    adjudicated parent; or 17        (3) falsely denies the existence of a presumed, 18    acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of the child. 19    (c) A presumed parent father may sign or otherwise 20authenticate a voluntary acknowledgment. 21(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 22    (750 ILCS 46/303)23    Sec. 303. Denial of parentage. A presumed parent may sign 24a denial of parentage. The denial is valid only if:25        (a) a voluntary acknowledgment described in Section   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    301 of this Act signed, or otherwise authenticated, by a 2    person man is filed pursuant to Section 305 of this Act; 3        (b) the denial is in a record, and is signed, or 4    otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury; and 5        (c) the presumed parent has not previously: 6            (1) acknowledged his parentage, unless the 7        previous voluntary acknowledgment has been rescinded 8        under Section 307 of this Act or successfully 9        challenged under Section 308 of this Act; or 10            (2) been adjudicated to be the parent of the 11        child. 12(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 13    (750 ILCS 46/305)14    Sec. 305. Effect of voluntary acknowledgment or denial of 15parentage. 16    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 307 and 308 17of this Act, a valid voluntary acknowledgment filed with the 18Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as provided by 19law, is equivalent to an adjudication of the parentage of a 20child and confers upon the acknowledged parent father all of 21the rights and duties of a parent. 22    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 23parentage established in accordance with Section 301 of this 24Act has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under 25this Act and serves as a basis for seeking a child support   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1order without any further proceedings to establish parentage. 2    (c) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 307 and 308 3of this Act, a valid denial by a presumed parent filed with the 4Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as provided by 5law, in conjunction with a voluntary acknowledgment, is 6equivalent to an adjudication of the nonparentage of the 7presumed parent and discharges the presumed parent from all 8rights and duties of a parent. 9(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 10    (750 ILCS 46/401)11    Sec. 401. Proceeding authorized. 12    (a) As soon as practicable, a court, or an administrative 13hearing officer in an Expedited Child Support System may, 14subject to subsection (c), order or direct a woman or person 15who gave birth to the child, the child, and an alleged, 16acknowledged parent, adjudicated parent, or the presumed 17parent to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing to 18determine inherited characteristics.19    (b) A court, or an administrative hearing officer in an 20Expedited Child Support System, upon the request of any party, 21or the child, shall, subject to subsection (c), order or 22direct a woman or person who gave birth to the child, the 23child, and a presumed, acknowledged, alleged, or adjudicated 24parent to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing to 25determine inherited characteristics unless the court   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1determines that (1) the conduct of the parent, acknowledged 2parent, adjudicated parent, or the presumed parent estops that 3party from denying parentage; (2) it would be inequitable to 4disprove the parent-child relationship between the child and 5the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent, and (3) 6that it is in the child's best interest to deny DNA testing 7considering the factors in Section 610(a)(3). It is presumed 8to be equitable and in the best interest of the child to grant 9a motion by the child seeking an order for genetic testing. The 10presumption may be overcome by clear and convincing evidence 11that extraordinary circumstances exist making the genetic 12testing contrary to the child's best interests. The court's 13order denying a child's request for genetic testing must state 14the basis upon which the presumption was overcome. The court's 15order granting a child's request for genetic testing must 16specify the ways in which testing results may be used for 17purposes of protecting the child's best interests. In a 18proceeding involving the application of this Section, a minor 19or incapacitated child must be represented by a guardian ad 20litem, child's representative, or attorney for the child.21    (c) Genetic testing may not be used to (1) challenge the 22parentage of a person who is a parent under Article 7 or the 23Gestational Surrogacy Act, inclusive, or (2) establish the 24parentage of a person who is a donor. 25As soon as practicable, a court or an administrative hearing 26officer in an Expedited Child Support System may, and upon the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1request of a party except as provided in Section 610 of this 2Act, or of the child, shall order or direct the mother, child, 3and alleged father to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) 4testing to determine inherited characteristics. If any party 5refuses to submit to genetic testing, the court may resolve 6the question of paternity against that party or enforce its 7order if the rights of others and the interests of justice so 8require. 9(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 10    (750 ILCS 46/402)11    Sec. 402. Requirements for genetic testing. 12    (a) The genetic testing shall be conducted by an expert 13qualified as an examiner of blood or tissue types and 14appointed by the court. The expert shall determine the genetic 15testing procedures. However, any interested party, for good 16cause shown, in advance of the scheduled genetic testing, may 17request a hearing to object to the qualifications of the 18expert or the genetic testing procedures. The expert appointed 19by the court shall testify at the pre-test hearing at the 20expense of the party requesting the hearing, except for an 21indigent party as provided in Section 405 of this Act. An 22expert not appointed by the court shall testify at the 23pre-test hearing at the expense of the party retaining the 24expert. Inquiry into an expert's qualifications at the 25pre-test hearing shall not affect either party's right to have   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1the expert qualified at trial. 2    (b) Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably relied 3upon by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed 4in a testing laboratory accredited by the American Association 5of Blood Banks or a successor to its functions. 6    (c) A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of one 7or more samples, or a combination of samples, of blood, buccal 8cells, bone, hair, or other body tissue or fluid. 9    (d) The testing laboratory shall determine the databases 10from which to select frequencies for use in calculation of the 11probability of parentage paternity based on the ethnic or 12racial group of an individual or individuals. If there is 13disagreement as to the testing laboratory's choice, the 14following rules apply: 15        (1) The individual objecting may require the testing 16    laboratory, within 30 days after receipt of the report of 17    the genetic testing, to recalculate the probability of 18    parentage paternity using an ethnic or racial group 19    different from that used by the laboratory. 20        (2) The individual objecting to the testing 21    laboratory's initial choice shall: 22            (A) if the frequencies are not available to the 23        testing laboratory for the ethnic or racial group 24        requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled 25        in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies; or 26            (B) engage another testing laboratory to perform   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        the calculations. 2    (e) If, after recalculation using a different ethnic or 3racial group, genetic testing does not reputably identify a 4person man as the parent father of a child, an individual who 5has been tested may be required to submit to additional 6genetic testing. 7(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 8    (750 ILCS 46/403)9    Sec. 403. Genetic test results. 10    (a) The expert shall prepare a written report of the 11genetic test results. If the genetic test results show that 12the alleged genetic parent father is not excluded, the report 13shall contain statistics based upon the statistical formula of 14combined parentage paternity index (CPI) and the probability 15of parentage paternity as determined by the probability of 16exclusion (Random Person Man Not Excluded = RPNE RMNE). The 17expert may be called by the court as a witness to testify to 18the expert's his or her findings and, if called, shall be 19subject to cross-examination by the parties. If the genetic 20test results show that the alleged genetic parent father is 21not excluded, any party may demand that other experts, 22qualified as examiners of blood or tissue types, perform 23independent genetic testing under order of court, including, 24but not limited to, blood types or other testing of genetic 25markers. The results of the genetic testing may be offered   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1into evidence. The number and qualifications of the experts 2shall be determined by the court. 3    (b) Documentation of the chain of custody of the blood or 4tissue samples, accompanied by an affidavit or certification 5in accordance with Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil 6Procedure, is competent evidence to establish the chain of 7custody. 8    (c) The report of the genetic test results prepared by the 9appointed expert shall be made by affidavit or by 10certification as provided in Section 1-109 of the Code of 11Civil Procedure and shall be mailed to all parties. A proof of 12service shall be filed with the court. The verified report 13shall be admitted into evidence at trial without foundation 14testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy, unless a 15written motion challenging the admissibility of the report is 16filed by either party within 28 days of receipt of the report, 17in which case expert testimony shall be required. A party may 18not file such a motion challenging the admissibility of the 19report later than 28 days before commencement of trial. Before 20trial, the court shall determine whether the motion is 21sufficient to deny admission of the report by verification. 22Failure to make that timely motion constitutes a waiver of the 23right to object to admission by verification and shall not be 24grounds for a continuance of the hearing to establish 25parentage paternity. 26(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/404)2    Sec. 404. Effect of genetic testing. Genetic testing taken 3under this Article shall have the following effect:4        (a) If the court finds that the conclusion of the 5    expert or experts, as disclosed by the evidence based upon 6    the genetic testing, is that the alleged genetic parent 7    father is not the parent of the child, the question of 8    parentage paternity shall be resolved accordingly. 9        (b) If the experts disagree in their findings or 10    conclusions, the question shall be weighed with other 11    competent evidence of parentage paternity. 12        (c) If the genetic testing results indicate that the 13    alleged genetic parent father is not excluded and that the 14    combined parentage paternity index is at least 1,000 to 1, 15    and there is at least a 99.9% probability of parentage 16    paternity, the alleged genetic parent father is presumed 17    to be the parent father, and this evidence shall be 18    admitted. 19        (d) A person man identified under subsection (c) of 20    this Section as the parent father of the child may rebut 21    the genetic testing results by other genetic testing 22    satisfying the requirements of this Article which: 23            (1) excludes the person man as a genetic parent 24        father of the child; or 25            (2) identifies another person man as the possible   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        parent father of the child. 2        (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Article, if 3    more than one person man is identified by genetic testing 4    as the possible parent father of the child, the court 5    shall order them to submit to further genetic testing to 6    identify the genetic parent father. 7(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 8    (750 ILCS 46/405)9    Sec. 405. Cost of genetic testing. The expense of the 10genetic testing shall be paid by the party who requests the 11genetic testing, except that the court may apportion the costs 12between the parties, upon request. When the genetic testing is 13requested by the party seeking to establish parentage 14paternity and that party is found to be indigent by the court, 15the expense shall be paid by the public agency providing 16representation; except that where a public agency is not 17providing representation, the expense shall be paid by the 18county in which the action is brought. When the genetic 19testing is ordered by the court on its own motion or is 20requested by the alleged or presumed parent father and that 21parent father is found to be indigent by the court, the expense 22shall be paid by the county in which the action is brought. Any 23part of the expense may be taxed as costs in the action, except 24that no costs may be taxed against a public agency that has not 25requested the genetic testing.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 2    (750 ILCS 46/407)3    Sec. 407. Independent genetic testing. Nothing in this 4Article shall prevent a party from obtaining genetic testing 5of the party's his or her own blood or tissue independent of 6those ordered by the court or from presenting expert testimony 7interpreting those tests or any other blood tests ordered 8under this Article. Reports of all the independent tests, 9accompanied by affidavit or certification pursuant to Section 101-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and notice of any expert 11witnesses to be called to testify to the results of those tests 12shall be submitted to all parties at least 30 days before any 13hearing set to determine the issue of parentage.14(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 15    (750 ILCS 46/408)16    Sec. 408. Additional persons to be tested. 17    (a) Subject to subsection (b), if a genetic-testing 18specimen is not available from a person man who may be the 19parent father of a child, for good cause and under 20circumstances the court considers to be just, the court may 21order the following individuals to submit specimens for 22genetic testing: 23        (1) the parents of the person man; 24        (2) brothers and sisters of the person man;   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        (3) other children of the person and the woman or 2    person who gave birth to the person man and their mothers; 3    and4        (4) other relatives of the person man necessary to 5    complete genetic testing. 6    (b) Issuance of an order under this Section requires a 7finding that a need for genetic testing outweighs the 8legitimate interests of the individual sought to be tested, 9and in no event shall an order be issued until the individual 10is joined as a party and given notice as required under the 11Code of Civil Procedure. 12(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 13    (750 ILCS 46/501)14    Sec. 501. Temporary orders. 15    (a) On a motion by a party and a showing of clear and 16convincing evidence of parentage, the court shall issue a 17temporary order for support of a child, including a non-minor 18child with a disability, if the order is appropriate and the 19individual ordered to pay support is: 20        (1) a presumed parent of the child; 21        (2) petitioning to have parentage adjudicated; 22        (3) identified as the parent father through genetic 23    testing under Article 4 of this Act; 24        (4) an alleged genetic parent father who has declined 25    to submit to genetic testing;   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        (5) shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the 2    child's parent father; 3        (6) the woman or person who gave birth to mother of the 4    child except under the Gestational Surrogacy Act; or 5        (7) anyone else determined to be the child's parent. 6    In determining the amount of a temporary child support 7award, the court shall use the guidelines and standards set 8forth in Sections 505, 505.2, and 513.5 of the Illinois 9Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act. 10    (b) A temporary order may include provisions for the 11allocation of parental responsibilities and parenting time as 12provided by the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 13Act. A temporary order may, in accordance with the provisions 14of subsection (a) of Section 508 of the Illinois Marriage and 15Dissolution of Marriage Act that relate to proceedings other 16than pre-judgment dissolution proceedings, include an award 17for interim attorney's fees and costs. 18    (c) Temporary orders issued under this Section shall not 19have prejudicial effect with respect to final child support, 20the allocation of parental responsibilities, or parenting time 21orders. 22(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 23    (750 ILCS 46/502)24    Sec. 502. Injunctive relief. 25    (a) In any action brought under this Act for the initial   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1determination of parentage, the allocation of parental 2responsibilities or parenting time, or for modification of a 3prior allocation order or judgment or parenting time order, 4the court, upon application of a party, may enjoin a party 5having physical possession or an allocation order or judgment 6from temporarily relocating the child from this State pending 7the adjudication of the issues of parentage, the allocation of 8parental responsibilities, and parenting time. When deciding 9whether to enjoin relocation of a child, or to order a party to 10return the child to this State, the court shall consider 11factors including, but not limited to: 12        (1) the extent of previous involvement with the child 13    by the party seeking to enjoin relocation or to have the 14    absent party return the child to this State; 15        (2) the likelihood that parentage will be established; 16    and 17        (3) the impact on the financial, physical, and 18    emotional health of the party being enjoined from 19    relocating the child or the party being ordered to return 20    the child to this State. 21    (b) A temporary restraining order or preliminary 22injunction under this Act shall be governed by the relevant 23provisions of Part 1 of Article XI of the Code of Civil 24Procedure.25    (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 26this Section, the court may decline to enjoin a domestic   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1violence victim having physical possession or an allocation 2order or judgment from temporarily or permanently relocating 3the child from this State pending an allocation of parental 4responsibilities or an adjudication of parenting time. In 5determining whether a person is a domestic violence victim, 6the court shall consider the following factors: 7        (1) a sworn statement by the person that the person 8    has good reason to believe that the person he or she is the 9    victim of domestic violence or stalking; 10        (2) a sworn statement that the person fears for the 11    person's his or her safety or the safety of the person's 12    his or her children; 13        (3) evidence from police, court, or other government 14    agency records or files; 15        (4) documentation from a domestic violence program if 16    the person is alleged to be a victim of domestic violence; 17        (5) documentation from a legal, clerical, medical, or 18    other professional from whom the person has sought 19    assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic violence; 20    and 21        (6) any other evidence that supports the sworn 22    statements, such as a statement from any other individual 23    with knowledge of the circumstances that provides the 24    basis for the claim, or physical evidence of the domestic 25    violence. 26(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/601)2    Sec. 601. Proceeding authorized. A civil proceeding may be 3maintained to adjudicate the parentage of a child. The 4proceeding is governed by the Code of Civil Procedure and 5Illinois Supreme Court Rules. Administrative proceedings 6adjudicating parentage paternity shall be governed by Section 710-17.7 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.8(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    (750 ILCS 46/602)10    Sec. 602. Standing. A complaint to adjudicate parentage 11shall be verified, shall be designated a petition, and shall 12name the person or persons alleged to be the parent of the 13child. Subject to Article 3 and Sections 607, 608, and 609 of 14this Act, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be 15maintained by:16        (a) the child;17        (b) the woman or person who gave birth to mother of the 18    child;19        (c) a pregnant woman or person;20        (d) a person man presumed or alleged alleging himself 21    to be the parent of the child; 22        (e) a woman presumed or alleging herself to be the 23    parent of the child;24        (e) (f) the support-enforcement agency or other   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    governmental agency authorized by other law;2        (f) (g) any person or public agency that has physical 3    possession of or has custody of or has been allocated 4    parental responsibilities for, is providing financial 5    support to, or has provided financial support to the 6    child;7        (g) (h) the Department of Healthcare and Family 8    Services if it is providing, or has provided, financial 9    support to the child or if it is assisting with child 10    support collections services;11        (h) (i) an authorized adoption agency or licensed 12    child welfare agency;13        (i) (j) a representative authorized by law to act for 14    an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain 15    a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated, or a 16    minor; or17        (j) (k) an intended parent.18(Source: P.A. 103-501, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (750 ILCS 46/603)20    Sec. 603. Subject matter and personal jurisdiction. 21    (a) The circuit courts of this State shall have 22jurisdiction of an action brought under this Act. In a civil 23action not brought under this Act, the provisions of this Act 24shall apply if parentage is at issue. The court may join any 25action under this Act with any other civil action in which this   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1Act is applicable.2    (b) An individual may not be adjudicated to be a parent 3unless the court has personal jurisdiction over the 4individual. 5    (c) A court of this State having jurisdiction to 6adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a 7nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the 8individual, if the conditions prescribed in Section 201 of the 9Uniform Interstate Family Support Act exist, including, but 10not limited to: if the individual engaged in sexual 11intercourse in this State and the child may have been 12conceived by that act of intercourse; the individual consented 13to assisted reproduction that occurred in this State that 14resulted in the conception of the child; if the individual 15consented to a medical procedure that occurred in this State 16related to assisted reproduction that resulted in the 17conception of the child; if the child was born or is 18anticipated to be born in this State; an individual consented 19to a mental health consultation that occurred in this State 20pursuant to the Gestational Surrogacy Act, or there is any 21other basis consistent with the constitutions of this State 22and the United States for the exercise of personal 23jurisdiction are fulfilled. 24    (d) Lack of jurisdiction over one individual does not 25preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage 26binding on another individual over whom the court has personal   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1jurisdiction. 2(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 3    (750 ILCS 46/604)4    Sec. 604. Venue. 5    (a) Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage is any 6county of this State in which a party resides, or if the 7presumed parent or alleged genetic parent father is deceased, 8in which a proceeding for probate or administration of the 9presumed parent's or alleged genetic parent's father's estate 10has been commenced, or could be commenced.11    (b) A proceeding for the allocation of parental 12responsibilities is commenced in the county where the child 13resides.14    (c) A parentage proceeding under the Gestational Surrogacy 15Act or Article 7 of this Act may be commenced in any county in 16this State.17(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 18    (750 ILCS 46/605)19    Sec. 605. Notice to presumed parent. 20    (a) Except in cases governed under the Gestational 21Surrogacy Act, the petitioner shall give notice of a 22proceeding to adjudicate parentage to the following 23individuals:24        (1) the woman or individual who gave birth to the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    child, unless a court has adjudicated that the woman or 2    individual is not a parent;3        (2) an individual who is a parent of the child under 4    this Act;5        (3) a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of 6    the child; and7        (4) an individual whose parentage is to be 8    adjudicated.9    (b) An individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) 10has a right to intervene in the proceeding.11    (c) Lack of notice required by subsection (a) does not 12render a judgment void. Lack of notice does not preclude an 13individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) from 14bringing a proceeding under subsection (b) of Section 609. 15    (d) A In any action brought under Article 3 or Article 6 of 16this Act where the individual signing the petition for an 17order establishing the existence of the parent-child 18relationship by consent or the individual alleged to be the 19parent in a petition is different from an individual who is 20presumed to be the parent of the child under Article 2 of this 21Act, a notice required by this Section shall be served on the 22individual presumed parent in the same manner as summonses are 23served in other civil proceedings or, in lieu of personal 24service, service may be made as follows:25        (1) The petitioner person requesting notice shall pay 26    to the clerk of the circuit court a mailing fee of $1.50   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    and furnish to the clerk of the circuit court an original 2    and one copy of a notice together with an affidavit 3    setting forth the individual's presumed parent's last 4    known address. The original notice shall be retained by 5    the clerk of the circuit court.6        (2) The clerk of the circuit court shall promptly mail 7    to the individual presumed parent, at the address 8    appearing in the affidavit, the copy of the notice by 9    certified mail, return receipt requested. The envelope and 10    return receipt shall bear the return address of the clerk 11    of the circuit court. The receipt for certified mail shall 12    state the name and address of the addressee and the date of 13    mailing and shall be attached to the original notice.14        (3) The return receipt, when returned to the clerk of 15    the circuit court, shall be attached to the original 16    notice and shall constitute proof of service.17        (4) The clerk of the circuit court shall note the fact 18    of service in a permanent record.19    (e) (b) The notice shall read as follows:20    "IN THE MATTER OF NOTICE TO .......... INDIVIDUAL PRESUMED 21PARENT. 22    You have been identified as an individual with a claim to 23parentage the presumed parent of ........., born on ......... 24The woman or person who gave birth to birth parent of the child 25is ......... 26    An action is being brought to establish the parent-child   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1relationship between the named child and a parent named by the 2person filing this action, .........3    You may As the presumed parent, you have certain legal 4rights with respect to the named child, including the right to 5notice of the filing of proceedings instituted for the 6establishment of parentage of the named child and, in some 7situations if named as a parent in a petition to establish 8parentage, the right to submit to, along with the woman or 9person who gave birth to the child birth parent and the child, 10deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) tests to determine inherited 11characteristics, subject to Section 401 610 of the Illinois 12Parentage Act of 2015. If you wish to assert your rights with 13respect to the child named in this notice, you must file with 14the Clerk of this Circuit Court of ......... County, Illinois, 15whose address is ........, within 30 days after the date of 16receipt of this notice, a declaration of parentage stating 17that you are, in fact, the parent of the named child and that 18you intend to assert your legal rights with respect to the 19child, or that you request to be notified of any further 20proceedings with respect to the parentage of the child.21    If you do not file a declaration of parentage or a request 22for notice, then you may be later barred from asserting 23parentage claims whatever legal rights you have with respect 24to the named child, and including the right to notice of any 25future proceedings for the establishment of parentage of the 26child, may be terminated without any further notice to you.   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1When your legal rights with respect to the named child are 2terminated, you will not be entitled to notice of any future 3proceedings.".4    (f) (c) The notice to a presumed parent under this Section 5in any action brought by a public agency shall be prepared and 6mailed by the public agency, and the mailing fee to the clerk 7of the circuit court shall be waived.8(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    (750 ILCS 46/606)10    Sec. 606. Summons. The summons that is served on a 11respondent shall include the return date on or by which the 12respondent must appear and shall contain the following 13information, in a prominent place and in conspicuous language, 14in addition to the information required to be provided under 15the laws of this State: "If you do not appear as instructed in 16this summons, you may be required to support the child named in 17this petition until the child is at least 18 years old. You may 18also have to pay the pregnancy and delivery costs of the woman 19or person who gave birth mother.".20(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 21    (750 ILCS 46/608)22    Sec. 608. Limitation; child having presumed parent. 23    (a) An action to challenge a presumption of parentage 24under Section 204 of this Act must be commenced by an   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1individual other than the child An alleged father, as that 2term is defined in Section 103 of this Act, must commence an 3action to establish a parent-child relationship for a child 4having a presumed parent not later than 2 years after the 5petitioner knew or should have known of the relevant facts. 6The time the petitioner is under legal disability or duress or 7the ground for relief is fraudulently concealed shall be 8excluded in computing the period of 2 years. The 2-year 9limitation does not apply to an action by the child. 10    (b) A proceeding seeking to declare the non-existence of 11the parent-child relationship between a child and the child's 12presumed parent father may be maintained at any time by a 13person described in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection 14(a) of Section 204 of this Act if the court determines that the 15presumed parent father and the woman or individual who gave 16birth to mother of the child neither cohabited nor engaged in 17sexual intercourse with each other during the probable time of 18conception.19    (c) If in a proceeding to adjudicate a presumed parent's 20parentage, another individual in addition to the woman or 21individual who gave birth to the child asserts a claim to 22parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate parentage 23under Section 610. An adjudication under this Section shall 24serve as a rebuttal or confirmation of a presumed parent as 25defined in subsection (p) of Section 103.26(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/609)2    Sec. 609. Limitation; child having acknowledged or 3adjudicated parent. 4    (a) If a child has an acknowledged parent, a signatory to 5the acknowledgment described in Section 301 of this Act or 6related denial may commence a proceeding seeking to challenge 7the acknowledgment or denial or challenge the parentage 8paternity of the child only within the time allowed under 9Section 309 of this Act.10    (b) If a child has an acknowledged parent or an 11adjudicated parent, an individual, other than the child, who 12is neither a signatory to the acknowledgment nor a party to the 13adjudication and who seeks to challenge an adjudication of 14parentage of the child must commence a proceeding not later 15than 2 years after the effective date of the acknowledgment or 16adjudication.17    (c) A proceeding under this Section is subject to the 18application of the principles of estoppel established in 19Section 610 of this Act.20(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 21    (750 ILCS 46/610)22    Sec. 610. Factors in adjudicating parentage Authority to 23deny motion for genetic testing. 24    (a) Consistent with Sections 205, 309, 608, 609, and 617   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1in cases in which there are competing claims to parentage and 2in proceedings In a proceeding in which the parentage of a 3child having a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent 4is at issue, the court shall consider the following factors 5when adjudicating the individual's parentage may deny a motion 6by a parent, presumed parent, acknowledged parent, adjudicated 7parent, alleged parent, or the child seeking an order for 8genetic testing of the parents and child if the court 9determines that: 10        (1) whether the conduct of the parent, acknowledged 11    parent, adjudicated parent, or the presumed parent estops 12    that party from denying parentage;13        (2) whether it would be inequitable to disprove the 14    parent-child relationship between the child and the 15    presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent; and16        (3) whether it is in the child's best interests to 17    adjudicate the individual to be the child's parent to deny 18    genetic testing, taking into account the following 19    factors:20            (A) the length of time between the current 21        proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that 22        the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent was 23        placed on notice that the presumed, acknowledged, or 24        adjudicated parent he or she might not be the 25        biological parent; 26            (B) the length of time during which the presumed,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent has assumed the 2        role of parent of the child; 3            (C) the facts surrounding the presumed, 4        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent's discovery of his 5        or her possible non-parentage nonparentage; 6            (D) the nature of the relationship between the 7        child and the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated 8        parent; 9            (E) the age of the child; 10            (F) the harm that may result to the child if the 11        presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parentage is 12        successfully disproved; 13            (G) the nature of the relationship between the 14        child and the presumed, acknowledged, adjudicated or 15        alleged parent any alleged parent; 16            (H) the extent to which the passage of time 17        reduces the chances of establishing the parentage of 18        another person and a child support obligation in favor 19        of the child;20            (I) other factors that may affect the equities 21        arising from the disruption of the parent-child 22        relationship between the child and the presumed, 23        acknowledged, or adjudicated parent or the chance of 24        other harm to the child; and 25            (J) any other factors the court determines to be 26        equitable.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (b) In a proceeding involving the application of this 2Section, a minor or incapacitated child must be represented by 3a guardian ad litem, child's representative, or attorney for 4the child. It shall be presumed to be equitable and in the best 5interests of the child to grant a motion by the child seeking 6an order for genetic testing. The presumption may be overcome 7by clear and convincing evidence that extraordinary 8circumstances exist making the genetic testing contrary to the 9child's best interests. The court's order denying a child's 10request for genetic testing must state the basis upon which 11the presumption was overcome. The court's order granting a 12child's request for genetic testing must specify the ways in 13which the testing results may be used for purposes of 14protecting the child's best interests.15     (c) (Blank). If the court denies a motion seeking an order 16for genetic testing, it shall issue an order adjudicating the 17presumed parent to be the parent of the child. 18(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 19    (750 ILCS 46/612)20    Sec. 612. Proceeding before birth. Except as otherwise 21provided for in this Act, a A proceeding to establish 22parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child, but 23may not be concluded until after the birth of the child. The 24following actions may be taken before the birth of the child:25        (a) service of process;   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        (b) the taking of depositions to perpetuate testimony; 2    and 3        (c) except as prohibited by Article 4 of this Act, 4    collection of specimens for genetic testing. 5(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 6    (750 ILCS 46/614)7    Sec. 614. Admissibility of results of genetic testing; 8expenses. 9    (a) Subject to the limitations of Section 401, if If a 10child has a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent, the 11results of genetic testing are inadmissible to adjudicate 12parentage unless performed: 13        (1) with the consent of both the woman or person who 14    gave birth to the child mother and the presumed, 15    acknowledged, or adjudicated parent; or 16        (2) pursuant to an order of the court under Section 17    401 402 of this Act and conducted consistent with Section 18    402 of this Act. 19    (b) Copies of bills for genetic testing and for prenatal 20and postnatal health care for the woman or person who gave 21birth mother and the child, which are furnished to the adverse 22party not less than 10 days before the date of a hearing are 23admissible to establish: 24        (1) the amount of the charges billed; and 25        (2) that the charges were reasonable, necessary, and   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    customary. 2    (c) Certified copies of the bills for costs incurred for 3pregnancy and childbirth shall be admitted into evidence at 4judicial or administrative proceedings without foundation 5testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy.6(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 7    (750 ILCS 46/615)8    Sec. 615. Consequences of declining genetic testing. 9    (a) Subject to the limitations of Section 401, an An order 10for genetic testing is enforceable through a proceeding for 11adjudication of contempt. 12    (b) If an individual whose parentage is being determined 13declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or 14administrative agency, the court or administrative agency may 15adjudicate parentage contrary to the position of that 16individual. 17    (c) Genetic testing of the woman or person who gave birth 18to the mother of a child is not a condition precedent to 19genetically testing the child and a person man whose parentage 20paternity is being determined. If the woman or person who gave 21birth to the child mother is unavailable or declines to submit 22to genetic testing, the court or administrative agency may 23order the genetic testing of the child and every person man 24whose parentage paternity is being adjudicated. 25(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/617)2    Sec. 617. Rules for adjudication of parentage of an 3alleged genetic parent. 4    (a) In a proceeding involving an alleged genetic parent 5who is not a presumed parent, if the woman or individual who 6gave birth to the child is the only other individual with a 7claim to parentage, the The court shall apply the following 8rules to adjudicate a claim of the parentage of a child:9        (a) The parentage of a child having an adjudicated 10    parent may be disproved only by admissible results of 11    genetic testing, or other means, excluding that person as 12    the parent of the child or identifying another person as 13    the parent of the child. 14        (1) (b) Unless the results of the genetic testing or 15    other evidence are admitted to rebut other results of 16    genetic testing, a person identified as the parent of a 17    child under Section 404 of this Act may be adjudicated the 18    parent of the child. 19        (2) (c) If the court finds that genetic testing under 20    Section 404 neither identifies nor excludes a person as 21    the parent of a child, the court may not dismiss the 22    proceeding. In that event, the results of genetic testing 23    and other evidence are admissible to adjudicate the issue 24    of parentage.25        (3) (d) Unless the results of genetic testing are   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    admitted to rebut other results of genetic testing, a 2    person excluded as the parent of a child by genetic 3    testing may be adjudicated not to be the parent of the 4    child. 5    (b) If in a proceeding involving an alleged genetic 6parent, at least one other individual in addition to the woman 7or individual who gave birth to the child has a claim to 8parentage of the child under this Act, the court shall 9adjudicate parentage under Section 610. 10(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 11    (750 ILCS 46/621)12    Sec. 621. Binding effect of determination of parentage. 13    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 14Section, a determination of parentage is binding on: 15        (1) all signatories to an acknowledgment or denial as 16    provided in Article 3 of this Act; and 17        (2) all parties to an adjudication by a court acting 18    under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional 19    requirements of Section 201 of the Uniform Interstate 20    Family Support Act. 21    (b) A child is not bound by a determination of parentage 22under this Act unless: 23        (1) the determination was based on an unrescinded 24    acknowledgment as provided in Article 3 of this Act and 25    the acknowledgment is either consistent with the results   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    of genetic testing or for a child born through assisted 2    reproduction; 3        (2) the adjudication of parentage was based on a 4    finding consistent with the results of genetic testing and 5    the consistency is declared in the determination or is 6    otherwise shown;7        (3) the child was a party or was represented in the 8    proceeding determining parentage by a guardian ad litem, 9    child's representative or attorney for the child; and 10        (4) the child was no longer a minor at the time the 11    proceeding was initiated and was the moving party 12    resulting in the parentage determination; and 13        (5) the determination of parentage was made under 14    Article 7 or the Gestational Surrogacy Act.15    (c) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, civil 16union, or substantially similar legal relationship, 17declaration of invalidity of marriage, civil union, or 18substantially similar legal relationship, or legal separation, 19the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the 20parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances 21that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of Section 201 of 22the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, and the final 23order: 24        (1) expressly identifies a child as a "child of the 25    marriage, civil union, or substantially similar legal 26    relationship", "issue of the marriage, civil union, or   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    substantially similar legal relationship", or uses similar 2    words indicating that a party to the marriage, civil 3    union, or substantially similar legal relationship is the 4    parent of the child; or 5        (2) provides for support of the child by the parties 6    to the marriage, civil union, or substantially similar 7    legal relationship, unless parentage is specifically 8    disclaimed in the order.9    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 10Section, a determination of parentage may be a defense in a 11subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage by an 12individual who was not a party to the earlier proceeding. 13    (e) A party to an adjudication of parentage may challenge 14the adjudication only under the laws of this State relating to 15appeal, vacation of judgments, or other judicial review. 16(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 17    (750 ILCS 46/622)18    Sec. 622. Allocation of parental responsibilities or 19parenting time prohibited to persons men who conceive a child 20father through sexual assault or sexual abuse. 21    (a) This Section applies to a person who has been found to 22be the parent father of a child under this Act and who:23        (1) has been convicted of or who has pled guilty or 24    nolo contendere to a violation of Section 11-1.20 25    (criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.30 (aggravated   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.40 (predatory 2    criminal sexual assault of a child), Section 11-1.50 3    (criminal sexual abuse), Section 11-1.60 (aggravated 4    criminal sexual abuse), Section 11-11 (sexual relations 5    within families), Section 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 6    Section 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 7    Section 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 8    child), Section 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse), or Section 9    12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual abuse) of the Criminal 10    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar 11    statute in another jurisdiction, for his conduct in 12    paragraph (1) of this subsection in conceiving fathering 13    that child; or14        (2) at a fact-finding hearing, is found by clear and 15    convincing evidence to have committed an act of 16    non-consensual sexual penetration for his conduct in 17    fathering that child.18    (b) A person described in subsection (a) shall not be 19entitled to an allocation of any parental responsibilities or 20parenting time with that child without the consent of the 21woman or person who gave birth to the child or the child's 22mother or guardian. If the person described in subsection (a) 23is also the guardian of the child, the person he does not have 24the authority to consent to parenting time or the allocation 25of parental responsibilities under this Section. If the woman 26or person who gave birth to mother of the child is a minor, and   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1the person described in subsection (a) is also the parent 2father or guardian of the woman or person who gave birth to the 3child mother, then the person he does not have the authority to 4consent to the allocation of parental responsibilities or 5parenting time.6    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 7nothing in this Section shall be construed to relieve the 8parent father described in subsection (a) of any support and 9maintenance obligations to the child under this Act. The woman 10or person who gave birth to the child or the child's mother or 11guardian may decline support and maintenance obligations from 12the parent father.13    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the parent 14father described in subsection (a) of this Section is not 15entitled to any inheritance or other rights from the child 16without the consent of the woman or person who gave birth to 17the child or the child's mother or guardian.18    (e) Notwithstanding any provision of the Illinois Marriage 19and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the parent, grandparent, 20great-grandparent, or sibling of the person described in 21subsection (a) of this Section does not have standing to bring 22an action requesting the allocation of parental 23responsibilities or parenting time with the child without the 24consent of the woman or person who gave birth to the child or 25the child's mother or guardian.26    (f) A petition under this Section may be filed by the woman   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1or person who gave birth to the child or the child's mother or 2guardian either as an affirmative petition in circuit court or 3as an affirmative defense in any proceeding filed by the 4person described in subsection (a) of this Section regarding 5the child.6(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 7    (750 ILCS 46/702)8    Sec. 702. Parental status of donor. A Except as provided 9in this Act, a donor is not a parent of a child conceived by 10means of assisted reproduction.11(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 12    (750 ILCS 46/703)13    Sec. 703. Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.14    (a) An individual who consents under this Section to 15assisted reproduction with the intent to be a parent of a child 16conceived by assisted reproduction is a parent of the child 17Any individual who is an intended parent as defined by this Act 18is the legal parent of any resulting child. If the donor and 19the intended parent have been represented by independent 20counsel and entered into a written legal agreement in which 21the donor relinquishes all rights and responsibilities to any 22resulting child, the intended parent is the parent of the 23child. An agreement under this subsection shall be entered 24into prior to any insemination or embryo transfer.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (b) The consent described in subsection (a) must be either 2of the following:3        (1) in a record signed before, on, or after the birth 4    of the child by the woman or individual who gave birth to 5    the child and by an individual who intends to be a parent 6    of the child; an acknowledgment of parentage under Section 7    301 is a record within the meaning of this subsection; or8        (2) in an agreement entered into before conception 9    that the woman or individual who gave birth to the child 10    and the individual who intends to be a parent of the child 11    intended they both would be a parent of the child.12    Failure to consent as required by paragraph (1) or (2) of 13subsection (b) does not preclude a court from finding consent 14to parent if the individual for the first 2 years of the 15child's life, including any period of temporary absence, 16resided in the same household with the child and openly held 17out the child as the individual's child If a person makes an 18anonymous gamete donation without a designated intended parent 19at the time of the gamete donation, the intended parent is the 20parent of any resulting child if the anonymous donor 21relinquished his or her parental rights in writing at the time 22of donation. The written relinquishment shall be directed to 23the entity to which the donor donated his or her gametes.24    (c) An individual who is an intended parent or the woman or 25individual who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding 26for a judgment of parentage before or after the birth of the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1child. If the court finds that the individual who did not give 2birth consented under subsection (b) of this Section, the 3court shall enter a judgment of parentage declaring the 4individual to be the parent seek a court order confirming the 5existence of a parent-child relationship prior to or after the 6birth of a child based on compliance with subsection (a) or (b) 7of this Section.8    (d) The woman or individual who will give or who gave birth 9to the child or an individual who is or claims to be a parent 10under this Section may commence an action before or after the 11birth of a child to obtain a judgment to declare that the 12intended parent or parents are the parent or parents of the 13resulting child immediately on birth of the child and order 14that parental rights and responsibilities vest exclusively in 15the intended parent or parents immediately on birth of the 16child. A judgment issued before the birth of the resulting 17child takes effect on the birth of the resulting child. The 18State, the Department, and the hospital where the child is or 19is expected to be born are not necessary parties to an action 20under this Section If the requirements of subsection (a) of 21this Section are not met, or subsection (b) of this Section is 22found by a court to be inapplicable, a court of competent 23jurisdiction shall determine parentage based on evidence of 24the parties' intent at the time of donation.25(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/704)2    Sec. 704. Withdrawal of consent of intended parent or 3donor. 4    (a) An intended parent or donor may withdraw consent to 5assisted reproduction any time before an insemination or a 6transfer that results in a pregnancy to use his or her gametes 7in a writing or legal pleading with notice to the other 8participants and to any clinic or health care providers 9facilitating the assisted reproduction. Failure to give notice 10to the clinic or health care provider does not affect a 11determination of parentage under this Act. 12    (b) An intended parent who withdraws consent under this 13Section prior to the insemination or embryo transfer is not a 14parent of any resulting child. If a donor withdraws consent to 15his or her donation prior to the insemination or the 16combination of gametes, the intended parent is not the parent 17of any resulting child. 18    If the intended parent or parents no longer wish to use any 19remaining cryopreserved fertilized ovum for medical purposes, 20the terms of the most recent informed consent of the intended 21parent or parents executed at the fertility center or a 22marital settlement agreement under a judgment of dissolution 23of marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 24dissolution of civil union governs the disposition of the 25fertilized ovum.26(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 46/704.5 new)2    Sec. 704.5. Disposition. 3    (a) An intended parent may withdraw consent to use the 4parent's gametes in a writing or legal pleading with notice to 5the other participant, or clinic, if applicable, or gamete 6bank, if applicable, prior to insemination or in vitro 7fertilization.8    (b) If the intended parent or parents no longer agree on 9the use of any cryopreserved fertilized ovum for medical 10purposes, the terms of the most recent informed consent of the 11intended parent or parents executed at the fertility center or 12a marital settlement agreement under a judgment of dissolution 13of marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 14dissolution of civil union governs the disposition of the 15cryopreserved fertilized ovum.  16    (750 ILCS 46/705)17    Sec. 705. Parental status of deceased individual. 18    (a) If an individual who intends to be a parent of a child 19conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period 20between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the 21child, the individual's death does not preclude the 22establishment of the individual's parentage of the child if 23the individual otherwise would be a parent of the child under 24this Act.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (b) If an individual who consented in a record to assisted 2reproduction by an individual who agreed to give birth to a 3child dies before a transfer of gametes or pre-embryos, the 4deceased individual is a parent of a child conceived by the 5assisted reproduction only if both of the following occurred: 6(i) Either the individual consented in a record that if 7assisted reproduction were to occur after the death of the 8individual, the individual would be a parent of the child or 9the individual's intent to be a parent of a child conceived by 10assisted reproduction after the individual's death is 11established by clear and convincing evidence; and (ii) the 12transfer of the gamete or pre-embryo transfer occurs not later 13than 36 months after the individual's death If an individual 14consents in a writing to be a parent of any child born of his 15or her gametes posthumously, and dies before the insemination 16of the individual's gametes or embryo transfer, the deceased 17individual is a parent of any resulting child born within 36 18months of the death of the deceased individual.19(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 20    (750 ILCS 46/707)21    Sec. 707. Burden of proof. Unless otherwise specified in 22this Act, the burden of proof in an action under this Section 23is by a preponderance of the evidence Parentage established 24under Section 703, a withdrawal of consent under Section 704, 25or a proceeding to declare the non-existence of the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1parent-child relationship under Section 708 of this Act must 2be proven by clear and convincing evidence.3(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 4    (750 ILCS 46/708)5    Sec. 708. Limitation on proceedings to declare the 6non-existence of the parent-child relationship. An individual 7who, at the time of a child's birth, is the spouse of the woman 8or person who gave birth cannot bring an action to declare the 9non-existence of the parent-child relationship under this 10Article unless filed and served not later than 2 years from the 11child's date of birth shall be barred if brought more than 2 12years following the birth of the child.13(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 14    (750 ILCS 46/709)15    Sec. 709. Establishment of parentage; requirements of 16Gestational Surrogacy Act.17    (a) In the event of gestational surrogacy, in addition to 18the requirements of the Gestational Surrogacy Act, a 19parent-child relationship is established between a person and 20a child if all of the following conditions are met prior to the 21birth of the child:22        (1) The gestational surrogate certifies that the 23    surrogate she did not provide a gamete for the child, and 24    that the surrogate she is carrying the resulting child for   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    the intended parents.2        (2) The spouse, if any, of the gestational surrogate 3    certifies that the spouse he or she did not provide a 4    gamete for the child.5        (3) (Blank). Each intended parent, or the parent's 6    legally authorized designee if an intended parent dies, 7    certifies that the child being carried by the gestational 8    surrogate was conceived using at least one of the intended 9    parents' gametes.10        (4) A physician licensed in the location state in 11    which the fertilized ovum was inseminated or transferred 12    to the gestational surrogate or the licensed physician 13    treating the gestational surrogate certifies that the 14    fetus child being carried by the gestational surrogate was 15    not conceived with the gamete of the using the gamete or 16    gametes of at least one of the intended parents, and that 17    neither the gestational surrogate nor the gestational 18    surrogate's spouse, if any, provided gametes for the child 19    being carried by the gestational surrogate and the 20    intended parents meet the eligibility requirements as set 21    forth in the Gestational Surrogacy Act.22        (5) The attorneys for the intended parents and the 23    gestational surrogate each certify that the parties who 24    entered into a gestational surrogacy agreement complied 25    with intended to satisfy the requirements of the 26    Gestational Surrogacy Act.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (b) All certifications under this Section shall be in 2writing and witnessed by 2 competent adults who are not the 3gestational surrogate, gestational surrogate's spouse, if any, 4or an intended parent. Certifications shall be on forms 5prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health and 6shall be executed prior to the birth of the child. All 7certifications shall be provided, prior to the birth of the 8child, to both the hospital where the gestational surrogate 9anticipates the delivery will occur and to the Illinois 10Department of Public Health. Certifications may be provided 11electronically. 12    (c) Parentage established in accordance with this Section 13has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under this 14Act.15    (d) The Illinois Department of Public Health shall adopt 16rules to implement this Section. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.) 18    (750 ILCS 46/710)19    Sec. 710. Applicability. This Article applies only to 20assisted reproductive arrangements or gestational surrogacy 21agreements contracts entered into after the effective date of 22this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly.23(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 24    (750 ILCS 46/903)  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    Sec. 903. Transitional provision. A proceeding to 2adjudicate parentage which was commenced before the effective 3date of this Act is governed by the law in effect at the time 4the proceeding was commenced, except that this Act applies to 5all pending actions and proceedings commenced before January 61, 2016 with respect to issues on which a judgment has not been 7entered. A proceeding to adjudicate parentage that was 8commenced before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 9the 104th General Assembly is governed by the law in effect at 10the time the proceeding was commenced. 11(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16; 99-769, eff. 1-1-17.) 12    Section 10. The Gestational Surrogacy Act is amended by 13changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, 30, 35, 55, 60, 70, and 75 14and by adding Sections 26, 27, 36, 37, and 39 as follows: 15    (750 ILCS 47/5)16    Sec. 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to establish 17consistent standards and procedural safeguards for the 18protection of all parties involved in a gestational surrogacy 19agreement contract in this State and to confirm the legal 20status of children born as a result of these agreements 21contracts. These standards and safeguards are meant to 22facilitate the use of this type of reproductive contract in 23accord with the public policy of this State.24(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 47/10)2    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Compensation" means payment of any valuable consideration 4for services in excess of reasonable medical and ancillary 5costs.6    "Donor" means a person who provides gametes intended for 7use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for compensation. 8"Donor" does not include a person who is a parent under Article 97 of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 or an intended parent 10under this Act an individual who contributes a gamete or 11gametes for the purpose of in vitro fertilization or 12implantation in another.13    "Gamete" means either a sperm or an egg.14    "Gestational surrogacy" means the process by which a woman 15or person woman attempts to become pregnant carry and give 16birth to a child conceived created through in vitro 17fertilization using the gamete or gametes of at least one of 18the intended parents and to which the gestational surrogate 19has made no genetic contribution.20    "Gestational surrogate" means a woman or person woman who 21agrees to engage in a gestational surrogacy.22    "Gestational surrogacy agreement contract" means a written 23agreement regarding gestational surrogacy.24    "Health care provider" means a person who is duly licensed 25to provide health care, including all medical, psychological,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1or counseling professionals.2    "Intended parent" means a person person or persons who 3consents to assisted reproduction, including enters into a 4gestational surrogacy agreement, such that the person is a 5legal contract with a gestational surrogate pursuant to which 6he or she will be the legal parent of the resulting child. 7"Intended In the case of a married couple, any reference to an 8intended parent" includes, in the case of a married couple, 9shall include both spouses husband and wife for all purposes 10of this Act. This term shall include the intended mother, 11intended father, or both. 12    "In vitro fertilization" means all medical and laboratory 13procedures that are necessary to effectuate the extracorporeal 14fertilization of egg and sperm.15    "Medical evaluation" means an evaluation and consultation 16of a physician meeting the requirements of Section 60.17    "Mental health evaluation" means an evaluation and 18consultation of a mental health professional meeting the 19requirements of Section 60.20    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 21in all its branches in the state in which they practice 22Illinois.23    "Pre-embryo" means a fertilized egg prior to 14 days of 24development.25    "Pre-embryo transfer" means all medical and laboratory 26procedures that are necessary to effectuate the transfer of a   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1pre-embryo into the uterine cavity.2(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 3    (750 ILCS 47/15)4    Sec. 15. Rights of Parentage. 5    (a) Except as provided in this Act, the woman or person 6woman who gives birth to a child is a parent presumed to be the 7mother of that child for purposes of State law.8    (b) In the case of a gestational surrogacy agreement that 9substantially complies with satisfying the requirements set 10forth in Sections 20 and 25 of this Act subsection (d) of this 11Section:12        (1) the intended parent or parents mother shall be 13    considered the parent or parents mother of the child for 14    all purposes of State law immediately upon the birth of 15    the child;16        (2) the intended father shall be the father of the 17    child for purposes of State law immediately upon the birth 18    of the child;19        (3) the child shall be considered the legitimate child 20    of the intended parent or parents for purposes of State 21    law immediately upon the birth of the child;22        (4) parental rights shall vest in the intended parent 23    or parents immediately upon the birth of the child;24        (5) sole custody of the child shall rest with the 25    intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    the child; and2        (2) (6) neither the gestational surrogate nor the 3    surrogate's spouse her husband, if any, shall be 4    considered the parents of the child for purposes of State 5    law immediately upon the birth of the child.6    (c) In the case of a gestational surrogacy agreement 7meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this 8Section, in the event of a laboratory error in which the 9resulting child is not genetically related to either of the 10intended parents or a donor who donated to the intended parent 11or parents, the intended parents will be the parents of the 12child for all purposes of State law unless otherwise 13determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.14    (d) (Blank). The parties to a gestational surrogacy shall 15assume the rights and obligations of subsections (b) and (c) 16of this Section if:17        (1) the gestational surrogate satisfies the 18    eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (a) of 19    Section 20;20        (2) the intended parent or parents satisfy the 21    eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (b) of 22    Section 20; and23        (3) the gestational surrogacy occurs pursuant to a 24    gestational surrogacy contract meeting the requirements 25    set forth in Section 25.26(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.)   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (750 ILCS 47/20)2    Sec. 20. Eligibility. 3    (a) A gestational surrogate shall be deemed to have 4satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, she has 5met the following requirements at the time the gestational 6surrogacy agreement contract is executed, the gestational 7surrogate:8        (1) she is at least 21 years of age;9        (2) she has given birth to at least one child;10        (3) she has completed a medical evaluation;11        (4) she has completed a mental health evaluation;12        (5) she has had and will have ongoing legal 13    representation by independent counsel, licensed in 14    Illinois and chosen by the surrogate, throughout the 15    course of the gestational surrogacy arrangement regarding 16    the terms undergone legal consultation with independent 17    legal counsel regarding the terms of the gestational 18    surrogacy contract and the potential legal consequences of 19    the gestational surrogacy agreement and the potential 20    consequences of the gestational surrogacy; and21        (6) she has obtained a health insurance policy that 22    covers major medical treatments and hospitalization and 23    the health insurance policy has a term that extends 24    throughout the duration of the expected pregnancy and for 25    8 weeks after the birth of the child; provided, however,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    that the policy may be procured by the intended parents on 2    behalf of the gestational surrogate pursuant to the 3    gestational surrogacy agreement contract.4    (b) The intended parent or parents shall be deemed to have 5satisfied the eligibility requirements of this Act if, he, 6she, or they have met the following requirements at the time 7the gestational surrogacy agreement contract is executed, the 8intended parent or parents:9        (1) is at least 21 years of age he, she, or they 10    contribute at least one of the gametes resulting in a 11    pre-embryo that the gestational surrogate will attempt to 12    carry to term;13        (2) are experiencing infertility as defined in 14    subsection (c) of Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 15    Code he, she, or they have a medical need for the 16    gestational surrogacy as evidenced by a qualified 17    physician's affidavit attached to the gestational 18    surrogacy contract and as required by the Illinois 19    Parentage Act of 2015;20        (3) he, she, or they have completed a mental health 21    evaluation; and22        (4) has had and will have ongoing he, she, or they have 23    undergone legal representation by consultation with 24    independent legal counsel, licensed in Illinois, 25    throughout the course of the gestational surrogacy 26    arrangement regarding the terms of the gestational   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    surrogacy agreement contract and the potential legal 2    consequences of the gestational surrogacy.3(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 4    (750 ILCS 47/25)5    Sec. 25. Requirements for a gestational surrogacy 6agreement contract. 7    (a) (Blank). A gestational surrogacy contract shall be 8presumed enforceable for purposes of State law only if:9        (1) it meets the contractual requirements set forth in 10    subsection (b) of this Section; and11        (2) it contains at a minimum each of the terms set 12    forth in subsection (c) of this Section.13    (b) A gestational surrogacy agreement contract shall meet 14the following requirements:15        (1) it shall be in writing;16        (2) it shall be executed prior to the commencement of 17    any medical procedures (other than medical or mental 18    health evaluations necessary to determine eligibility of 19    the parties pursuant to Section 20 of this Act) in 20    furtherance of the gestational surrogacy:21            (i) by a gestational surrogate meeting the 22        eligibility requirements of subsection (a) of Section 23        20 of this Act and, if married, the gestational 24        surrogate's spouse husband; and25            (ii) by the intended parent or parents meeting the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        eligibility requirements of subsection (b) of Section 2        20 of this Act. In the event an intended parent is 3        married, both the intended parent and spouse husband 4        and wife must execute the gestational surrogacy 5        agreement contract;6        (3) each of the gestational surrogate and the intended 7    parent or parents shall have been represented by 8    independent legal counsel licensed in Illinois regarding 9    the terms of the gestational surrogacy agreement and the 10    potential legal consequences of the gestational surrogacy 11    separate counsel in all matters concerning the gestational 12    surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy contract;13        (3.5) it shall indicate each of the gestational 14    surrogate and the intended parent or parents shall have 15    signed a written acknowledgement that each party has he or 16    she received information about the legal, financial, and 17    contractual rights, expectations, penalties, and 18    obligations of the surrogacy agreement;19        (4) it shall require the intended parent or parents to 20    pay for independent legal representation for the 21    surrogate; 22        (5) if the gestational surrogacy agreement contract 23    provides for the payment of compensation to the 24    gestational surrogate, the compensation shall have been 25    placed in escrow with an independent escrow agent that is 26    independent of and is not affiliated with either the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    intended parents' attorney or the gestational surrogate's 2    attorney prior to the gestational surrogate's commencement 3    of any medical procedure (other than medical or mental 4    health evaluations necessary to determine the gestational 5    surrogate's eligibility pursuant to subsection (a) of 6    Section 20 of this Act); and7        (6) (5) it shall be witnessed by 2 competent adults or 8    shall be notarized consistent with Illinois law.9    (b-5) A gestational surrogacy agreement may provide for 10the payment of compensation and reasonable expenses. 11    (c) A gestational surrogacy agreement contract shall 12provide for:13        (1) the express written agreement of the gestational 14    surrogate to:15            (i) undergo pre-embryo transfer and attempt to 16        become pregnant carry and give birth to the child; and17            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the 18        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 19        of the child;20        (2) if the gestational surrogate is married, the 21    express agreement of the gestational surrogate's spouse 22    her husband to:23            (i) undertake the obligations imposed on the 24        gestational surrogate pursuant to the terms of the 25        gestational surrogacy agreement contract;26            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 2        of the child;3        (3) the right of the gestational surrogate to utilize 4    the services of a physician of the gestational surrogate's 5    her choosing, after consultation with the intended 6    parents, to provide the gestational surrogate with her 7    care during the pregnancy; and8        (4) the express written agreement of the intended 9    parent or parents to:10            (i) accept custody of the child immediately upon 11        the child's his or her birth; and12            (ii) assume sole responsibility for the support of 13        the child immediately upon the child's his or her 14        birth; .15        (5) the right of the gestational surrogate to make all 16    health and welfare decisions regarding the surrogate and 17    the pregnancy, except that this Act does not enlarge or 18    diminish the surrogate's right to terminate their 19    pregnancy, and any written or oral agreement purporting to 20    waive or limit these rights shall be void as against 21    public policy;22        (6) the disclosure of all intended parent's financial 23    obligations with regard to the gestational surrogate, 24    including compensation and expenses; and 25        (7) the inclusion of information about each party's 26    right under this Act to terminate the surrogacy agreement.   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    (d) (Blank). A gestational surrogacy contract shall be 2presumed enforceable for purposes of State law even though it 3contains one or more of the following provisions:4        (1) the gestational surrogate's agreement to undergo 5    all medical exams, treatments, and fetal monitoring 6    procedures that the physician recommended for the success 7    of the pregnancy;8        (2) the gestational surrogate's agreement to abstain 9    from any activities that the intended parent or parents or 10    the physician reasonably believes to be harmful to the 11    pregnancy and future health of the child, including, 12    without limitation, smoking, drinking alcohol, using 13    nonprescribed drugs, using prescription drugs not 14    authorized by a physician aware of the gestational 15    surrogate's pregnancy, exposure to radiation, or any other 16    activities proscribed by a health care provider;17        (3) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 18    pay the gestational surrogate reasonable compensation; and19        (4) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 20    pay for or reimburse the gestational surrogate for 21    reasonable expenses (including, without limitation, 22    medical, legal, or other professional expenses) related to 23    the gestational surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy 24    contract.25    (e) (Blank). In the event that any of the requirements of 26this Section are not met, a court of competent jurisdiction   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1shall determine parentage based on evidence of the parties' 2intent.3(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 4    (750 ILCS 47/26 new)5    Sec. 26. Effect of subsequent change of marital status.6    (a) Unless a gestational surrogacy agreement expressly 7provides otherwise, both of the following apply:8        (1) The marriage of a surrogate after the surrogacy 9    agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the 10    validity of the agreement, the spouse's consent to the 11    agreement is not required, and the spouse is not a 12    presumed parent of a child conceived by assisted 13    reproduction under the agreement.14        (2) The dissolution, annulment, or declaration of 15    invalidity of the surrogate's marriage, the legal 16    separation of the surrogate, or a judgment of separate 17    maintenance concerning the surrogate after the surrogacy 18    contract is signed by all parties does not affect the 19    validity of the agreement.20        (3) Unless a surrogacy agreement expressly provides 21    otherwise, both of the following apply:22            (A) The marriage of an intended parent after the 23        surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not 24        affect the validity of a surrogacy agreement, the 25        consent of the spouse is not required, and the spouse   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1        is not, based on the agreement, a parent of a child 2        conceived by assisted reproduction under the 3        agreement.4            (B) The dissolution, annulment, or declaration of 5        invalidity of an intended parent's marriage, the legal 6        separation of an intended parent, or a judgment of 7        separate maintenance concerning an intended parent 8        after the agreement is signed by all parties does not 9        affect the validity of the agreement and, except as 10        otherwise provided in Section 36, the intended parent 11        is a parent of the child. 12    (750 ILCS 47/27 new)13    Sec. 27. Termination.14    (a) A party to a gestational surrogacy agreement may 15terminate the agreement at any time before an embryo transfer 16by giving notice of termination in a record to all other 17parties. If an embryo transfer does not result in a pregnancy, 18a party may terminate the agreement at any time before a 19subsequent embryo transfer.20    (b) Unless a gestational surrogacy agreement provides 21otherwise, on termination of the agreement under subsection 22(a), the parties are released from the agreement, except that 23each intended parent remains responsible for expenses that are 24contemplated under the agreement and incurred by the 25gestational surrogate through the date of termination of the   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1surrogacy agreement or as otherwise agreed to in the 2gestational surrogacy agreement. 3    (c) Unless there is fraud, a party is not liable to any 4other party for a penalty or liquidated damages for 5terminating a gestational surrogacy agreement under this 6Section.  7    (750 ILCS 47/30)8    Sec. 30. Duty to support. 9    (a) Any person who is a considered to be the parent of a 10child pursuant to Section 15 of this Act shall be obligated to 11support the child.12    (b) The breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement 13contract by the intended parent or parents shall not relieve 14such intended parent or parents of the support obligations 15imposed by this Act.16    (c) A gamete donor may be liable for child support only if 17he or she fails to enter into a legal agreement with the 18intended parent or parents in which the intended parent or 19parents agree to assume all rights and responsibilities for 20any resulting child, and the gamete donor relinquishes his or 21her rights to any gametes, resulting embryos, or children.22(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 23    (750 ILCS 47/35)24    Sec. 35. Establishment of parentage the parent-child   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1relationship. 2    (a) In the event of gestational surrogacy, in addition to 3the requirements of the Articles 2 and 3 of the Illinois 4Parentage Act of 2015, a parent-child relationship is 5established by operation of law, upon birth of the child, 6between a person and a child if all of the following conditions 7are met:8        (1) Each intended parent certifies compliance with the 9    eligibility requirements of Section 20.10        (2) The gestational surrogate certifies compliance 11    with the eligibility requirements of Section 20 and did 12    not provide a gamete for the child, and that the 13    gestational surrogate is carrying the resulting child for 14    the intended parents.15        (3) A physician licensed in the state in which the 16    pre-embryo was transferred to the gestational surrogate 17    certifies that the pre-embryo that was transferred to the 18    gestational surrogate was not formed with the gamete of 19    the gestational surrogate.20        (4) The attorneys for the intended parent or parents 21    and the gestational surrogate and spouse, if any, each 22    certify that the parties substantially satisfied the 23    requirements of Section 25 of this Act For purposes of the 24    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, a parent-child 25    relationship shall be established prior to the birth of a 26    child born through gestational surrogacy if, in addition   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    to satisfying the requirements of Articles 2 and 3 of the 2    Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, the attorneys representing 3    both the gestational surrogate and the intended parent or 4    parents certify that the parties entered into a 5    gestational surrogacy contract intended to satisfy the 6    requirements of Section 25 of this Act with respect to the 7    child.8    (b) All certifications under this Section shall be in 9writing and witnessed by 2 competent adults who are not the 10gestational surrogate, gestational surrogate's spouse, if any, 11or an intended parent. Certifications shall be on forms 12prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health and 13shall be executed before the birth of the child. All 14certifications shall be provided, before the birth of the 15child, to both the hospital where the gestational surrogate 16anticipates the delivery will occur and to the Illinois 17Department of Public Health The attorneys' certifications 18required by subsection (a) of this Section shall be filed on 19forms prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health 20and in a manner consistent with the requirement of the 21Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.22    (c) Parentage established in accordance with this Section 23has the full force and effect of a judgment entered under this 24Act.25    (d) The Illinois Department of Public Health shall adopt 26rules to implement this Section.   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 2    (750 ILCS 47/36 new)3    Sec. 36. Establishment of parentage with a substantially 4compliant agreement.5    (a) A gestational surrogacy agreement that substantially 6complies with this Act is enforceable.7    (b)(1) Before, on, or after the birth of a child conceived 8by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy 9agreement substantially compliant with this Act, a party to 10the agreement may commence an action in the circuit court for 11entry of a parentage judgment. The requested parentage 12judgment may be issued before or after the child's birth as 13requested by the parties. Either the gestational surrogate or 14the intended parent may bring the action. If the action is 15brought prior to all certifications required by Section 35 16being filed, all parties must receive notice of such action.17    (2) A petition shall include: (A) a copy of the executed 18gestational surrogacy agreement; (B) the certification of the 19assisted reproduction physician under Section 35; and (C) 20certifications from the attorneys representing the intended 21parent or parents and the gestational surrogate and spouse (if 22any) under Section 35. A petition supported by such 23certifications shall be sufficient to establish parentage and 24a hearing shall not be required unless the court requires 25additional information which cannot reasonably be ascertained   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1without a hearing.2    (3) Upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that 3the petition satisfies paragraph (2) of subsection (b), a 4court shall no later than 30 days from the filing of the 5petition, issue a judgment of parentage.6    (4) The court shall issue a judgment:7        (A) declaring that each intended parent is a parent of 8    the child and ordering that parental rights and duties 9    vest immediately upon the birth of the child exclusively 10    in each intended parent;11        (B) declaring that the gestational surrogate and the 12    surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, are not the 13    parents of the child;14        (C) if necessary, ordering that the hospital where the 15    child will be or has been born, treat the intended parent 16    or parents as the sole legal parent or parents for all 17    purposes;18        (D) designating the content of the birth record and 19    directing the Department of Public Health to designate 20    each intended parent as a parent of the child, if such 21    record has not yet been established or needs to be 22    amended;23        (E) if necessary, ordering that the child be 24    surrendered to the intended parent or parents; and25        (F) for other relief the court determines proper.26    (5) To protect the privacy of the child and the parties,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1all records related to such action shall be impounded.2    (6) The Department of Public Health, the town or city 3clerk, and the hospital where the child is born or is intended 4to be born shall not be necessary parties to a proceeding.5    (7) Parentage judgments issued under this Section shall 6conclusively establish the parent-child relationship for all 7purposes. 8    (750 ILCS 47/37 new)9    Sec. 37. Parentage and substantial noncompliance.10    (a) If a gestational surrogacy agreement does not 11substantially comply with the requirements of this Act:12        (1) The court shall determine the rights and duties of 13    the parties to the agreement consistent with the intent of 14    the parties at the time of execution, taking into account 15    the best interests of the child.16        (2) Each party to the surrogacy agreement and any 17    individual who at the time of the execution of the 18    agreement was a spouse of a party to the agreement has 19    standing to maintain an action to adjudicate an issue 20    related to the enforcement of the agreement. Any party to 21    the agreement not joining in the action shall be provided 22    with notice of the proceeding.  23    (750 ILCS 47/39 new)24    Sec. 39. Jurisdiction and venue. Any judicial proceeding   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1under the Gestational Surrogacy Act is subject to the 2jurisdiction and venue provisions set forth in Sections 603 3and 604 of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015. 4    (750 ILCS 47/55)5    Sec. 55. Damages. 6    (a) Except as expressly provided in the gestational 7surrogacy agreement or in subsection (b), if the agreement is 8breached by the gestational surrogate or one or more intended 9parents, the non-breaching party is entitled to the remedies 10available at law or in equity contract, the intended parent or 11parents shall be entitled to all remedies available at law or 12equity.13    (b) The breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by 14one or more intended parents does not relieve the intended 15parent of the support obligations imposed by the parent and 16child relationship under this Act Except as expressly provided 17in the gestational surrogacy contract, the gestational 18surrogate shall be entitled to all remedies available at law 19or equity.20    (c) Specific performance is not a remedy available for 21breach by a gestational surrogate of provision in the 22agreement that the gestational surrogate be impregnated, 23terminate a pregnancy, or submit to medical procedures.24    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), if an 25intended parent is determined to be a parent of the child,   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1specific performance is a remedy available for either of the 2following:3        (1) Breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by a 4    gestational surrogate that prevents an intended parent 5    from exercising the full rights of parentage immediately 6    upon birth of the child.7        (2) Breach of the gestational surrogacy agreement by 8    an intended parent that prevents the intended parent's 9    acceptance of the duties of parentage immediately upon 10    birth of the child. 11(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 12    (750 ILCS 47/60)13    Sec. 60. Rulemaking. The Department of Public Health may 14adopt rules pertaining to the required medical and mental 15health evaluations for a gestational surrogacy agreement 16contract. Until the Department of Public Health adopts such 17rules, medical and mental health evaluations and procedures 18shall be conducted in accordance with the recommended 19guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive 20Medicine and the American College of Obstetricians and 21Gynecologists. The rules may adopt these guidelines or others 22by reference.23(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 24    (750 ILCS 47/70)  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    Sec. 70. Irrevocability. No action to invalidate a 2gestational surrogacy meeting the requirements of subsection 3(d) of Section 20 and Section 25 15 of this Act or to challenge 4the rights of parentage established pursuant to the 5Gestational Surrogacy Act Section 15 of this Act and the 6Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 shall be commenced after 12 7months from the date of birth of the child.8(Source: P.A. 99-763, eff. 1-1-17.) 9    (750 ILCS 47/75)10    Sec. 75. Application. The provisions of this Act shall 11apply only to gestational surrogacy agreements contracts 12entered into after the effective date of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.) 14    Section 15. The Adoption Act is amended by adding Section 1521.1 as follows: 16    (750 ILCS 50/21.1 new)17    Sec. 21.1. Confirmatory adoption for children born through 18assisted reproduction.19    (a) As used in this Section, the following words and terms 20shall have the following meanings unless the context shall 21clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:22    "Assisted reproduction" means the definition provided in 23the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015.  HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    "Marriage" means and includes civil union and any legal 2relationship that provides substantially the same rights, 3benefits, and responsibilities as marriage and is recognized 4as valid in the state or jurisdiction in which it was entered.5    "Petitioner" means the person filing a petition for 6adoption in accordance with this Section.7    (b) A petition for adoption may be filed in accordance 8with this Section if a child is born (1) as a result of 9assisted reproduction involving a donor in compliance with 10Article 7; or (2) as a result of an arrangement in substantial 11compliance with the Gestational Surrogacy Act and the 12pleadings provide relevant documentation regarding compliance 13or substantial compliance.14    (c) The court may proceed in accordance with this Section 15under other circumstances not outlined in subsection (b) in 16its discretion.17    (d) A complete petition shall be comprised of the 18following:19        (1) the petition for adoption signed by each 20    petitioner;21        (2) a copy of the petitioners' marriage certificate, 22    if petitioners are married;23        (3) a declaration by the petitioners explaining the 24    circumstances of the child's birth through assisted 25    reproduction, attesting to their consent to assisted 26    reproduction, and medical or other documentation relating   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1    to the assisted reproduction regarding procurement of 2    donor gamete(s) or medical procedures resulting in the 3    pregnancy and birth of the child; and4        (4) a copy of the child's birth certificate.5    (e) A complete petition for adoption, as described in 6subsection (c) of this Section, shall serve as the 7petitioners' written consents to adoption, and no additional 8consent or notice shall be required. The petition shall be 9verified by the petitioners.10    (f) If the petitioners conceived through assisted 11reproduction with donor gamete or donor embryo under Article 7 12of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, the court shall not 13require notice of the adoption to the donor.14    (g) Unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause 15shown and supported by written findings, for purposes of 16evaluating and granting a petition for adoption under this 17Section, the court may not require any of the following:18        (1) an in-person hearing or appearance;19        (2) an investigation or home study by, notice to, or 20    approval of the Department of Children and Family 21    Services;22        (3) appointment of a guardian ad litem;23        (4) a criminal background check; or24        (5) a minimum residency period in the home of the 25    petitioners.26    (h) The court shall grant the adoption under this Section   HB2568 Re-Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 10837 JRC 20918 b1and issue a decree of adoption within 30 days or as soon as is 2possible after the petition has been filed if it finds:3        (1) the child was born through assisted reproduction;4        (2) each intended parent consented to the assisted 5    reproduction as evidenced by the parent's signature to the 6    petition; and7        (3) there are no competing claims of parentage.8    (i) A petition to adopt pursuant to this Section, when a 9petitioner's parentage is presumed or legally recognized under 10Illinois law, must not be denied on the basis that the 11petitioner's parentage is already presumed or legally 12recognized.13    (j) Effect on other laws. When parentage is presumed or 14legally recognized under Illinois law, it may not be 15considered as evidence of parentage or evidence of the best 16interests of the child in any manner that the parties did not 17petition for adoption under this Section.18    (k) For purposes of a confirmatory adoption, jurisdiction 19and venue is governed by Section 603 of the Illinois Parentage 20Act of 2015 or the Adoption Act.21    (l) The confidentiality provisions in Section 18 apply to 22this Section.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law, except that the changes to Sections 301, 302, 25303, and 305 of the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 take effect 26on January 1, 2026.